Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF421.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1675YH (2) 91 je/js H.F. 421 Section 1. Section 85.26, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. a. An original proceeding for benefits under chapter 3 10A, subchapter III , this chapter , or chapter 85A or 85B , 4 shall not be maintained in any contested case unless the 5 proceeding is commenced within two years from the date of the 6 occurrence of the injury for which benefits are claimed or, if 7 weekly compensation benefits are paid under section 10A.315 , 8 within three years from the date of the last payment of weekly 9 compensation benefits. 10 b. If the two-year period provided in paragraph âaâ is 11 exceeded because the employee was unable to obtain an accurate 12 diagnosis of the injury within the period from a health service 13 provider chosen by the employer pursuant to section 85.27, the 14 period shall be extended until such time as the employee can 15 obtain such a diagnosis. This paragraph shall only apply if 16 a delay in such a diagnosis beyond the two-year period was 17 solely the result of action taken or not taken by the health 18 service provider and if the employee demonstrates that the 19 employee made a diligent effort to obtain such a diagnosis from 20 the health care provider without undue delay on the employeeâs 21 part. 22 c. For the purposes of this section , âdate of the occurrence 23 of the injuryâ means the date that the employee knew or should 24 have known that , based on the nature, seriousness, and probable 25 compensable character of the injury was work-related , that the 26 injury was serious enough to have a permanent adverse impact on 27 the employeeâs employment or employability . 28 Sec. 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 29 retroactively to injuries occurring on or after August 1, 2022. 30